src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaqit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vaʼit: # Noun 128 'eng /est vahe/fin' - full paradigm
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Nom: [vaʼit, vait]
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Gen: [vaʼit, vait]
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Par: [vaʼitõ, vaitõ]
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Dat: [vaʼitõn, vaitõn]
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Ins: [vaʼitõks, vaitõks]
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Ill: [vaʼitõ, vaitõ]
     vaʼit+N+Sg+Ela: [vaʼitstõ, vaitstõ]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Nom: [vaʼitõd, vaitõd]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Gen: [vaʼitõd, vaitõd]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Par: [vaʼitidi, vaitidi]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Dat: [vaʼitõdõn, vaitõdõn]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Ins: [vaʼitõdõks, vaitõdõks]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Ill: [vaʼitiž, vaitiž]
     vaʼit+N+Pl+Ela: [vaʼitist, vaitist]
